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DTC P11 22/19 Accel. Closed Position SW Circuit (Short)

DTC P11 23/19 Accel. Closed Position SW Circuit (Open)

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

Refer to DTC P1120/19 on page DI−67.

DTC No. DTC Detection Condition Trouble Area

P1122/19
Conditions (a) and (b) continue 0.5 sec. or more:
(a)PDLON
(b) VA > Fully closed study voltage +0.41 V

SShort inacceleratorpedalclosedpositionswitchcircuit
SAcceleratorpedalclosedpositionswitch
SEngineECU

PDL does not turn ON even once while driving vehicle
(2 trip detection logic) SOpen inaccelerator pedalclosed positionswitchcircuit

P1123/19 Conditions (a)and (b)continue5sec.ormore:
(a) PDL OFF
(b) IDL ON

SOpen in acceleratorpedal closed positionswitch circuit
SAcceleratorpedalclosedpositionswitch
SEngineECU

WIRING DIAGRAM

Refer to DTC P1120/19 on page DI−67.

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Checkacceleratorpedalclosedpositionswitch.

PREPARATION:
Disconnect the accelerator pedal closed position switch con-
nector.
CHECK:
Measure the resistance between terminals of the accelerator
pedal closed position switch.
OK:

Terminals Accelerator pedal Resistance

1 − 2 Fully closed 10k � orhigher

1 − 2 Fully open 0 to 20 �

NG Replace accelerator pedal closed position
switch(SeePubNo.RM6 17E,pageED −9).

OK
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2 Check voltage between terminal PDL of engine ECU and body ground.

PREPARATION:
(a)Remove theglovecompartmentdoor.
(b) Turn the ignition switch ON.
CHECK:
Measure the voltage between terminal PDL of the engine ECU
and body ground.
OK:

Accelerator pedal Voltage

Fully closed 9 to 14 V

Fully open 0 to 3 V

OK Check and replace engine ECU
(See page IN−1 9) .

NG

Check for open and short in harness and connector between engine ECU and accelerator pedal
closed position switch and body ground (See page IN−1 9) .


